Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-214
Penalties; action to recover; disposition of funds collected.

Penalties imposed or accruing by any bylaw or regulation of the library board and any court costs and attorney's fees may be recovered in a civil action before any court having jurisdiction, such action to be instituted in the name of the library board of the city, village, county, or township. Money, other than any court costs and attorney's fees, collected in such actions shall be forthwith placed in the treasury of the city, village, township, or county to the credit of the city, village, township, or county library fund. Attorney's fees collected pursuant to this section shall be placed in the treasury of the city, village, or county and credited to the budget of the city, village, or county attorney's office. All attorney's fees collected on behalf of a township shall be paid over to the county treasury and credited to the budget of the county attorney's office.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 9, p. 317;

R.S.1913, § 3800;

C.S.1922, § 3193;

C.S.1929, § 51-209;

R.S.1943, § 51-214;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 256;

Laws 1984, LB 229, § 1.